Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1. Department of Forestry.

§ 10.1-1100.
Department of Forestry; appointment of the State Forester.

The Department of Forestry, hereinafter referred to in this chapter as the Department, is continued as an agency under the supervision of the Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry. The Department shall be headed by the State Forester, who shall be appointed by the Governor to serve at his pleasure for a term coincident with his own.

Any vacancy in the office of the State Forester shall be filled by appointment by the Governor pursuant to the provisions of Article V, Section 10 of the Constitution of Virginia.

The State Forester shall be a technically trained forester and shall have both a practical and theoretical knowledge of forestry.

History.

1986, c. 567, § 10-31.1; 1988, c. 891; 1993, c. 699.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry” has been substituted for “Secretary of Commerce and Trade” in the first sentence of the first paragraph.

Law Review.

For article addressing significant developments in Virginia law pertaining to air quality, water quality and solid and hazardous waste, between 1990 and 1992, see “Environmental Law,” 26 U. Rich. L. Rev. 729 (1992).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

18 M.J. Trees and Timber, § 3.

§ 10.1-1100.1.
Certified mail; subsequent mail or notices may be sent by regular mail.

Whenever in this chapter the State Forester or the Department is required to send any mail or notice by certified mail and such mail or notice is sent certified mail, return receipt requested, then any subsequent, identical mail or notice that is sent by the State Forester or the Department may be sent by regular mail.

History.

2011, c. 566.

§ 10.1-1101.
General powers of Department.

The Department shall have the following general powers, all of which, with the approval of the State Forester, may be exercised by a unit of the Department with respect to matters assigned to that organizational entity:

Employ personnel required to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

Make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under this chapter, including, but not limited to contracts with private nonprofit organizations, the United States, other state agencies and governmental subdivisions of the Commonwealth;

Accept bequests and gifts of real and personal property as well as endowments, funds, and grants from the United States government and any other source. To these ends, the Department shall have the power to comply with conditions and execute agreements as necessary, convenient or desirable;

Promulgate regulations necessary or incidental to the performance of duties or execution of powers conferred under this chapter;

Receive, hold in trust and administer any donation made to it for the advancement of forest resources of the Commonwealth;

Undertake evaluation and testing of products and technologies relating to replacement of petroleum-based lubricants and hydraulic fluids with lubricants and hydraulic fluids made or derived from vegetables or vegetable oil, and promote the use of such products and technologies found to be beneficial in preserving and enhancing environmental quality; and

Do all acts necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

1986, c. 567, § 10-31.2; 1988, c. 891; 1995, c. 111.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 324, cl. 1, provides: “1. That the Virginia State Forest Regulations, 4 VAC 5-40-10 et seq., and the Virginia Reforestation of Timberlands Regulations, 4 VAC 5-60-10 et seq., are hereby transferred from the Department of Conservation and Recreation to the Department of Forestry, effective July 1, 2005, and shall remain in full force and effect until amended, modified, or repealed. The Department of Forestry shall update the terminology and references to the Code of Virginia pursuant to the authority to promulgate regulations provided in subdivision 4 of §

10.1-1101

. This update shall be exempt from the provisions of the Administrative Process Act. Any future amendments shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act. The Administrative Code numbers shall be changed under that exempt action to conform to the Department of Forestry’s regulatory numbering system as assigned by the Virginia Code Commission.”

§ 10.1-1102.
Board of Forestry.

The Board of Forestry within the Department of Forestry, referred to in this chapter as the Board, shall be composed of 13 members appointed by the Governor. At least two members shall be representatives of the pine pulpwood industry; two members shall be representatives of the pine lumber industry; two members shall be representatives of the hardwood lumber industry; one member shall be a representative of the timber harvesting industry; and two members shall be small forest landowners. In making appointments to the Board, the Governor shall take into account the geographic diversity of board membership as it relates to Virginia’s forest resources. Beginning July 1, 2012, the Governor’s appointments shall be staggered as follows: four members for a term of one year, three members for a term of two years, three members for a term of three years, and three members for a term of four years. After the initial staggering of terms, appointments shall be for four-year terms. The State Forester shall serve as executive officer of the Board.

No member of the Board, except the executive officer, shall be eligible for more than two successive terms; however, persons subsequently appointed to fill vacancies may serve two additional successive terms after the terms of the vacancies they were appointed to fill have expired. All vacancies in the membership of the Board shall be filled by the Governor for the unexpired term.

The Board shall meet at least three times a year for the transaction of business. Special meetings may be held at any time upon the call of the executive officer of the Board, or a majority of the members of the Board.

Members of the Board shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred as a result of their membership on the Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 10-84; 1986, c. 539; 1986, c. 567, § 10-84.1; 1988, c. 891; 1990, c. 127; 1992, c. 145; 2011, cc. 691, 714; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, cc. 691 and 714, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act providing for (i) staggered terms for board, council, or commission members and (ii) two-year terms for chairmen appointed by the Governor shall not affect current members or chairmen whose terms have not expired as of July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 20 provides: “That the terms of the persons currently serving as members of the Reforestation Board and the Board of Forestry shall expire on July 1, 2012.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 21 provides: “That the new appointments to the Board of Forestry made after July 1, 2012, shall be made in accordance with the provisions the 18th enactment of this act.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 691 and 714 are identical, and rewrote the first paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 18, are identical, and rewrote the first paragraph, which formerly read: “The Board of Forestry within the Department of Forestry, referred to in this chapter as the Board, shall be composed of one member from each congressional district appointed by the Governor. Beginning July 1, 2011, the Governor’s appointments shall be staggered as follows: four members for a term of one year, three members for a term of two years, and four members for a term of three years. Thereafter, appointments shall be for four-year terms. The State Forester shall serve as executive officer of the Board.”

§ 10.1-1103.
Powers of the Board.

The Board shall be charged with matters relating to the management of forest resources in the Commonwealth.

The Board shall advise the Governor and the Department on the state of forest resources within the Commonwealth and the management of forest resources. The Board shall encourage persons, agencies, organizations and industries to implement development programs for forest resource management and counsel them in such development. In addition, the Board shall recommend plans for improving the state system of forest protection, management and replacement, and shall prepare an annual report on the progress and conditions of state forest work.

The Board shall formulate recommendations to the State Forester concerning regulations and other matters applicable to Article 10 (§

10.1-1170

et seq.), including types of equipment to be purchased, rental rates for equipment, and reforestation practices.

History.

1986, c. 567, § 10-84.2; 1988, c. 891; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 20 provides: “That the terms of the persons currently serving as members of the Reforestation Board and the Board of Forestry shall expire on July 1, 2012.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 21 provides: “That the new appointments to the Board of Forestry made after July 1, 2012, shall be made in accordance with the provisions the 18th enactment of this act.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 18, are identical, and inserted the A and B designations at the beginning of the first and second paragraphs, respectively; and added subsection C.